Arkansas, session 2025, HB1923.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 15-11-503(4)(B), concerning the definition
of "eligible company" used under the Arkansas Tourism Development Act, as
amended by Acts 2025, No. 169, is amended to read as follows:
(B) For the purpose of constructing, operating, or
intending to operate a tourism attraction project, whether owned or leased,
located in a Natural State Initiative Opportunity Zone that meets the
standards promulgated under §§ 15-11-504 and 15-11-512:
(i) A minimum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars
($250,000) fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in a high-unemployment county; or
(ii) A minimum of five hundred thousand dollars
($500,000) one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) in any other county;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 15-11-512(e)(2)(A), concerning the
boundaries for Natural State Initiative Opportunity Zones, is amended to read
as follows:
*ANS439*
03/28/2025 1:32:19 PM ANS439

HB1923
(2)(A) The Natural State Initiative Opportunity Zones shall be
located within or no more than one-eighth (⅛) of a one (1) mile outside the
boundaries of a state park, a cultural or historic site, or a cultural or
educational center.
































03/28/2025 1:32:19 PM ANS439